Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact
§ 33-21-302.
Compact provisions generally.

The Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact is enacted into law and entered into on behalf of this state with all other states legally joining in the compact in a form substantially as follows:

History.

2016 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Article I Findings and Declaration of Purpose

The party states find that:

The health and safety of the public are affected by the degree of compliance with advanced practice registered nurse (APRN) licensure requirements and the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state APRN licensure laws;

Violations of APRN licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public;

The expanded mobility of APRNs and the use of advanced communication technologies as part of our nation’s health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of APRN licensure and regulation;

New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state APRN licensure laws difficult and complex;

The current system of duplicative APRN licensure for APRNs practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for both APRNs and states;

Uniformity of APRN licensure requirements throughout the states promotes public safety and public health benefits.

The general purposes of this compact are to:

Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the public’s health and safety;

Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the areas of APRN licensure and regulation, including promotion of uniform licensure requirements;

Facilitate the exchange of information between party states in the areas of APRN regulation, investigation and adverse actions;

Promote compliance with the laws governing APRN practice in each jurisdiction;

Invest all party states with the authority to hold an APRN accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state licenses;

Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of APRN licenses; and

Provide opportunities for interstate practice by APRNs who meet uniform licensure requirements.

Article II Definitions

As used in this compact:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” or “APRN” means a registered nurse who has gained additional specialized knowledge, skills and experience through a program of study recognized or defined by the Interstate Commission of APRN Compact Administrators (“commission”), and who is licensed to perform advanced nursing practice. An advanced practice registered nurse is licensed in an APRN role that is congruent with an APRN educational program, certification and commission rules;

“Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against an APRN, including actions against an individual’s license or multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting an APRN’s authorization to practice, including the issuance of a cease and desist action;

“Alternative program” means a, nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by a licensing board;

“APRN licensure” means the regulatory mechanism used by a party state to grant legal authority to practice as an APRN;

“APRN uniform licensure requirements” means minimum uniform licensure, education and examination requirements as adopted by the commission;

“Coordinated licensure information system” means an integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing information on APRN licensure and enforcement activities related to APRN licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards;

“Current significant investigatory information” means:

Investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the APRN to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or

Investigative information that indicates that the APRN represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the APRN has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.

“Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board;

“Home state” means the party state that is the APRN’s primary state of residence;

“Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body responsible for regulating the practice of advanced practice registered nursing;

“Multistate license” means an APRN license to practice as an APRN issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the APRN to practice as an APRN in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege, in the same role and population focus as the APRN is licensed in the home state;

“Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal authorization associated with an APRN multistate license that permits an APRN to practice as an APRN in a remote state, in the same role and population focus as the APRN is licensed in the home state;

“Noncontrolled prescription drug” means a device or drug that is not a controlled substance and is prohibited under state or federal law from being dispensed without a prescription. The term includes a device or drug that bears or is required to bear the legend “caution: federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription” or “prescription only” or other legend that complies with federal law;

“Party state” means any state that has adopted this compact;

“Population focus” means a specific patient population that is congruent with the APRN educational program, certification and commission rules;

“Prescriptive authority” means the legal authority to prescribe medications and devices as defined by party state laws;

“Remote state” means a party state that is not the home state;

“Single state license” means an APRN license issued by a party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party state;

“State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States and the District of Columbia;

“State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules and regulations that govern APRN practice, define the scope of advanced nursing practice, including prescriptive authority, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. State practice laws do not include the requirements necessary to obtain and retain an APRN license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.

Article III General Provisions and Jurisdiction

A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial APRN licensure or APRN licensure by endorsement. The procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric based information by APRN applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from the federal bureau of investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records.

By rule, the commission shall adopt the APRN uniform licensure requirements. The uniform licensure requirements shall provide the minimum requirements for APRN multistate licensure in party states, provided that the commission may adopt rules whereby an APRN, with an unencumbered license on the effective date of this compact, may obtain, by endorsement or otherwise, and retain a multistate license in a party state.

In order to obtain or retain a multistate license, an APRN must meet, in addition to the uniform licensure requirements, the home state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable home state laws.

By rule, the commission shall identify the approved APRN roles and population foci for licensure as an APRN. An APRN issued a multistate license shall be licensed in an approved APRN role and at least one (1) approved population focus.

An APRN multistate license issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing the APRN to practice as an APRN in each party state, under a multistate licensure privilege, in the same role and population focus as the APRN is licensed in the home state. If an applicant does not qualify for a multistate license, a single state license may be issued by a home state.

Issuance of an APRN multistate license shall include prescriptive authority for noncontrolled prescription drugs, unless the APRN was licensed by the home state prior to the home state’s adoption of this compact and has not previously held prescriptive authority. Further:

An APRN granted prescriptive authority for noncontrolled prescription drugs in the home state may exercise prescriptive authority for noncontrolled prescription drugs in any remote state while exercising a multistate licensure privilege under an APRN multistate license. The APRN shall not be required to meet any additional eligibility requirements imposed by the remote state in exercising prescriptive authority for noncontrolled prescription drugs;

Prescriptive authority in the home state for an APRN who was not granted prescriptive authority at the time of initial licensure by the home state, prior to the adoption of this compact, shall be determined under home state law;

Prescriptive authority eligibility for an APRN holding a single state license shall be determined under the law of the licensing state.

For each state in which an APRN seeks authority to prescribe controlled substances, the APRN shall satisfy all requirements imposed by the state in granting or renewing such authority.

An APRN issued a multistate license is authorized to assume responsibility and accountability for patient care independent of a supervisory or collaborative relationship with a physician. This authority may be exercised in the home state and in any remote state in which the APRN exercises a multistate licensure privilege. For an APRN issued a single state license in a party state, the requirement for a supervisory or collaborative relationship with a physician shall be determined under applicable party state law.

All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with state due process laws, to take adverse action against an APRN’s multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation or any other action that affects an APRN’s authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a party state takes any action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state of any actions by remote states.

An APRN practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. APRN practice is not limited to patient care, but shall include all advanced nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is located. APRN practice in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will subject the APRN to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.

This compact does not affect additional requirements imposed by states for advanced practice registered nursing. However, a multistate licensure privilege to practice registered nursing granted by a party state shall be recognized by other party states as satisfying any state law requirement for registered nurse licensure as a precondition for authorization to practice as an APRN in that state.

Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party state’s single state APRN license as provided under the laws of each party state. However, the single state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice as an APRN in any other party state.

Article IV Applications for APRN Licensure in a Party State

Upon application for an APRN multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held or is the holder of a licensed practical/vocational nursing license, a registered nursing license or an advanced practice registered nurse license issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program.

An APRN may hold a multistate APRN license, issued by the home state, in only one (1) party state at a time.

If an APRN changes primary state of residence by moving between two (2) party states, the APRN must apply for APRN licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior home state shall be deactivated in accordance with applicable commission rules and the following:

The APRN may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence;

A multistate APRN license shall not be issued by the new home state until the APRN provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate APRN license from the new home state.

If an APRN changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a nonparty state, the APRN multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single state license, valid only in the former home state.

Article V Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing Boards

In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the authority to:

Take adverse action against an APRN’s multistate licensure privilege to practice within that party state as follows:

Only the home state shall have power to take adverse action against an APRN’s license issued by the home state;

For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct that occurred outside of the home state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.

Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on an APRN’s authority to practice within that party state;

Complete any pending investigations of an APRN who changes primary state of residence during the course of such investigations. The licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home state of any such actions;

Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a party state licensing board for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to that court’s practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing licensing board shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located;

Obtain and submit, for an APRN licensure applicant, fingerprints or other biometric based information to the federal bureau of investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the federal bureau of investigation record search on criminal background checks and use the results in making licensure decisions;

If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected APRN the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that APRN; and

Take adverse action based on the factual findings of another party state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking the adverse action.

If adverse action is taken by a home state against an APRN’s multistate licensure, the privilege to practice in all other party states under a multistate licensure privilege shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the APRN’s multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against an APRN’s multistate license shall include a statement that the APRN’s multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order.

Nothing in this compact shall override a party state’s decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any APRN for the duration of the APRN’s participation in an alternative program.

Article VI Coordinated Licensure Information System and Exchange of Information

All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all APRNs, licensed registered nurses and licensed practical/vocational nurses. This system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each APRN, as submitted by party states, to assist in the coordinated administration of APRN licensure and enforcement efforts.

The commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection and exchange of information under this compact.

All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, any current significant investigative information, denials of applications, including the reasons for such denials, and APRN participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board regardless of whether the participation is deemed nonpublic or confidential under state law.

Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure information system only to party state licensing boards.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate information that may not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express permission of the contributing state.

Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing the information.

Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing the information shall be removed from the coordinated licensure information system.

The compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:

Identifying information;

Licensure data;

Information related to alternative program participation information; and

Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by commission rules.

The compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents and information requested by another party state.

Article VII Establishment of the Interstate Commission of APRN Compact
Administrators

The party states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the Interstate Commission of APRN Compact Administrators, in accordance with the following:

The commission is an instrumentality of the party states;

Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings;

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Membership, voting and meetings of the commission shall be as follows:

Each party state shall have and be limited to one (1) administrator. The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this compact for each party state. Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists;

Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an administrator’s participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication;

The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission;

All meetings shall be open to the public and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Article VIII;

The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss:

Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this compact;

The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;

Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;

Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate;

Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;

Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;

Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this compact; or

Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute.

If a meeting or portion of a meeting is closed pursuant to this subsection, the commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken and the reasons for the action, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in the minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

The commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including but not limited to:

Establishing the fiscal year of the commission;

Providing reasonable standards and procedures:

For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and

Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission.

Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of the meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public’s interest, the privacy of individuals and proprietary information, including trade secrets. The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the commission shall make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed;

Establishing the titles, duties, authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the commission;

Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission;

Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this compact after the payment and reserving of all of its debts and obligations.

The commission shall publish its bylaws and rules and any amendments, in a convenient form on the website of the commission.

The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.

The commission shall meet and take actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws.

The commission shall have the following powers:

To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states;

To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;

To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including but not limited to employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations;

To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including but not limited to sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space or other resources;

To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this compact and to establish the commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;

To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same. At all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;

To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, whether real, personal or mixed. At all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety;

To sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal or mixed;

To establish a budget and make expenditures;

To borrow money;

To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, consumer representatives, and other interested persons;

To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;

To adopt and use an official seal; and

To perform other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of APRN licensure and practice.

Financing of the commission shall be as follows:

The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities;

The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the interstate commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states;

The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing adequate funding. Nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by, and with the authority of, the party state;

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.

Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification of the commission shall be as follows:

The administrators, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person;

The commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional, willful or wanton misconduct. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his own counsel;

The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person.

Article VIII Rulemaking

The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and any adopted rules. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this compact.

Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission.

Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:

On the website of the commission; and

On the website of each licensing board or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.

The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:

The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;

The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed rule;

A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and

The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.

Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.

The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.

The commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing. Hearings shall be conducted as follows:

In a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request; and

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section.

If no one appears at the public hearing, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.

Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received.

The commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.

Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:

Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;

Prevent a loss of commission or party state funds; or

Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule.

The commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision shall not take effect without the approval of the commission.

Article IX Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement

Oversight of the compact shall be as follows:

Each party state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact’s purposes and intent;

The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes related to this compact. Failure to provide service of process in any proceeding to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact or promulgated rules.

Default, technical assistance and termination shall be as follows:

If the commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall:

Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the commission; and

Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state’s membership in this compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default;

Termination of membership in this compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state’s licensing board, the defaulting state’s licensing board and each of the party states;

A state whose membership in this compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination;

The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state;

The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.

Dispute resolution of the compact shall be as follows:

Upon request by a party state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states;

The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate;

In the event the commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this compact:
